src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_HYLJE
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 48 front je
!!€  hylje: hylje+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  hylkeenä: hylje+N+Sg+Ess
0:je  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kee  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ke  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:jet  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:kee  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:ke  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ke  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
+Use/NG:ke  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:je  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:kee  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ke  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ke  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_POHJE
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 48 back je
!!€  pohje: pohje+N+Sg+Nom # thigh
!!€  pohkeena: pohje+N+Sg+Ess
0:je  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kee  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ke  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:jet  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:kee  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ke  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ke  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
+Use/NG:ke  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:je  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:kee  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ke  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ke  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

!! ### Dual nominative paradigms
!!  A handful of words can use two completely distinct inflection patterns
!!  where a bit of overlapping inflection has been cut out. These words have
!!  two nominatives, and thus often two dictionary entries: one which is
!!  regular entry from the e^ class of words (like NOUN_ASTE), and one which
!!  is consonant final, and may have inverse gradation.

LEXICON NOUN_ASKAR
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 49 ar
!!€  askar: askar+N+Sg+Nom # chore
!!€  askare: askar+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  askarena: askar+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  askareena: askar+N+Sg+Ess
0  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ee  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ee  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:e  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
:e  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ee  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KYYNEL
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 49 el
!!€  kyynel: kyynel+N+Sg+Nom # tear
!!€  kyynele: kyynel+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  kyynelenä: kyynel+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  kyyneleenä: kyynel+N+Sg+Ess
0  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ee  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ee  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ee  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_SÄEN
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 49 en
!!€  säen: säen+N+Sg+Nom # spark
!!€  säkene: säen+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  säkenenä: säen+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  säkeneenä: säen+N+Sg+Ess
0:en  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kene  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kene  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:kenee  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ken  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:kene  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:en  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:kene  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:kenee  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ken  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:kene  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:en  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:ken  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:nene  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:kene  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ken  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
+Use/NG:kene  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
+Use/NG:kene  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:en  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:kene  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:kene  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
+Use/NG:kenee  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:en  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:ken  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:kene  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:kene  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_TAIVAL
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 49 val
!!€  taival: taival+N+Sg+Nom # hike
!!€  taipale: taival+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  taipalena: taival+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  taipaleena: taival+N+Sg+Ess
0:val  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pale  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
+Use/NG:palee  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pal  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:val  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:palee  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
+Use/NG:pal  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
+Use/NG:val  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:pal  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pel  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:val  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:pale  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:pale  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
+Use/NG:palee  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:val  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:pal  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:pale  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;


LEXICON NOUN_UDAR
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 49 dar
!!€  udar: udar+N+Sg+Nom # teat
!!€  utare: udar+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  utarena: udar+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  utareena: udar+N+Sg+Ess
0:dar  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tare  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tare  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:taree  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tar  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:tare  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:dar  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:tare  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
+Use/NG:taree  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:tar  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
+Use/NG:tare  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:dar  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:tar  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:tare  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:tare  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:tar  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
+Use/NG:tare  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
+Use/NG:tare  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:dar  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
+Use/NG:tare  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:tare  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
+Use/NG:taree  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:dar  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:tar  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:tare  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:tare  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_PENGER
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 49 ger
!!€  penger: penger+N+Sg+Nom # bank
!!€  penkere: penger+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  penkerenä: penger+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  penkereenä: penger+N+Sg+Ess
0:ger  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kere  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
+Use/NG:keree  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ker  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ger  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:kere  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
+Use/NG:keree  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ker  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:ger  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:ker  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ker  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ger  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:kere  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
+Use/NG:keree  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ger  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:ker  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:kere  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
