src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
aaltosulje+N:aalto#sul  NOUN_POHJE  ;
aaltosulje+N:aaltosul  NOUN_POHJE  ;
alje+N:al  NOUN_POHJE  ;
alkutaival+N:alkutai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
askar+N:askar  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
elämäntaival+N:elämän#tai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
elämäntaival+N:elämäntai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
elontaival+N:elon#tai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
elontaival+N:elontai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
erämaataival+N:erä#maa#tai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
erämaataival+N:erämaatai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
espanjansammal+N:espanjan#sammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
eteläamerikanisohylje+N:eteläamerikaniso#hyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
eteläamerikanisohylje+N:eteläamerikanisohyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
grönlanninhylje+N:grönlannin#hyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
grönlanninhylje+N:grönlanninhyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
haaremihylje+N:haaremi#hyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
haaremihylje+N:haaremihyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
hakasulje+N:haka#sul  NOUN_POHJE  ;
hakasulje+N:hakasul  NOUN_POHJE  ;
harmaahylje+N:harmaa#hyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
harmaahylje+N:harmaahyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
harmosammal+N:harmosammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
hetesammal+N:hetesammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
hiuskoukkusammal+N:hiuskoukku#sammal NOUN_ASKAR ;
housunlahje+N:housun#lah  NOUN_POHJE  ;
housunlahje+N:housunlah  NOUN_POHJE  ;
huhmar+N:huhmar  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
hylje+N:hyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
ilonkyynel+N:ilon#kyynel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
ilonkyynel+N:ilonkyynel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
irlanninsammal+N:irlanninsammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
itämerenhylje+N:itämeren#hyl NOUN_HYLJE ;
jokipenger+N:jokipen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
kaarisulje+N:kaari#sul  NOUN_POHJE  ;
kaarisulje+N:kaarisul  NOUN_POHJE  ;
kalkkilähdesammal+N:kalkkilähde#sammal NOUN_ASKAR ;
keuhkosammal+N:keuhko#sammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
kiehkuraishylje+N:kiehkuraishyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
kirjohylje+N:kirjohyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
kokoaskel+N:kokoaskel  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
korpitaival+N:korpi#tai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
korpitaival+N:korpitai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
korvahylje+N:korvahyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
krillihylje+N:krillihyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
kulmasulje+N:kulma#sul  NOUN_POHJE  ;
kulmasulje+N:kulmasul  NOUN_POHJE  ;
kulosammal+N:kulo#sammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
kuplahylje+N:kuplahyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
kyynel+N:kyynel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
laaksopenger+N:laakso#pen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
laaksopenger+N:laaksopen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
lahje+N:lah  NOUN_POHJE  ;
lahosammal+N:lahosammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
liekosammal+N:lieko#sammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
lopputaival+N:loppu#tai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
lopputaival+N:lopputai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
metsätaival+N:metsä#tai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
metsätaival+N:metsätai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
näkinsammal+N:näkin#sammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
naurunkyynel+N:naurun#kyynel NOUN_KYYNEL ;
nuotiosammal+N:nuotiosammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
palje+N:pal  NOUN_POHJE  ;
partahylje+N:partahyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
penger+N:pen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
petkel+N:petkel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
petkel+N:petkel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
pettupetkel+N:pettu#petkel NOUN_KYYNEL ;
pikataival+N:pika#tai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
pikataival+N:pikatai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
pohje+N:poh  NOUN_POHJE  ;
purolähdesammal+N:purolähde#sammal NOUN_ASKAR ;
rahje+N:rah  NOUN_POHJE  ;
rantapenger+N:ranta#pen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
rantapenger+N:rantapen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
ratapenger+N:rata#pen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
ratapenger+N:ratapen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
ruskosammal+N:ruskosammal  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
säen+N:sä  NOUN_SÄEN  ;
saimaanhylje+N:saimaanhyl  NOUN_POHJE  ;
sävel+N:sävel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
seppel+N:seppel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
seppel+N:seppel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
siirtymätaival+N:siirtymä#tai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
siirtymätaival+N:siirtymätai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
sivuaskel+N:sivu#askel  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
sulje+N:sul  NOUN_POHJE  ;
suojapenger+N:suoja#pen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
suojapenger+N:suojapen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
surunkyynel+N:surun#kyynel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
surunkyynel+N:surunkyynel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
taival+N:tai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
telje+N:tel  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
tienpenger+N:tien#pen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
tienpenger+N:tienpen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
tiepenger+N:tie#pen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
tiepenger+N:tiepen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
tulvapenger+N:tulva#pen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
tulvapenger+N:tulvapen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
turkishylje+N:turkishyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
tykkipenger+N:tykki#pen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
tykkipenger+N:tykkipen  NOUN_PENGER  ;
tyynenmerenhylje+N:tyynenmerenhyl  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
udar+N:u  NOUN_UDAR  ;
valituskyynel+N:valitus#kyynel NOUN_KYYNEL ;
vapaataival+N:vapaatai  NOUN_TAIVAL  ;
varvasaskel+N:varvasaskel  NOUN_ASKAR  ;
vehje+N:veh  NOUN_HYLJE  ;
verikyynel+N:veri#kyynel NOUN_KYYNEL ;
voitonseppele+N:voiton#seppel  NOUN_KYYNEL  ;
